District of Columbia statutes.
16-916.01a

— Appendices to § 16-916.01a.

[APPENDICES I. Schedule of Basic Child Support Obligations, II. Worksheet A: Sole Physical Custody, and III. Worksheet B: Shared Physical Custody to follow.]

Combined Adjusted Gross Income
One Child
Two Children
Three Children
Four or More Children

12,382
3,261
4,634
5,410
6,063

12,600
3,310
4,702
5,488
6,151

13,200
3,444
4,890
5,705
6,393

13,800
3,577
5,076
5,919
6,632

14,400
3,695
5,244
6,113
6,847

15,000
3,810
5,411
6,306
7,063

15,600
3,926
5,578
6,500
7,279

16,200
4,042
5,740
6,693
7,494

16,800
4,157
5,902
6,886
7,710

17,400
4,270
6,064
7,074
7,926

18,000
4,371
6,226
7,261
8,141

18,600
4,471
6,389
7,448
8,352

19,200
4,571
6,550
7,629
8,547

19,800
4,669
6,692
7,791
8,728

20,400
4,760
6,835
7,952
8,908

21,000
4,851
6,958
8,114
9,088

21,600
4,941
7,081
8,276
9,269

22,200
5,032
7,205
8,438
9,449

22,800
5,123
7,328
8,599
9,629

23,400
5,214
7,451
8,761
9,809

24,000
5,305
7,575
8,905
9,990

24,600
5,395
7,698
9,045
10,170

25,200
5,486
7,821
9,185
10,350

25,800
5,577
7,945
9,326
10,530

26,400
5,668
8,068
9,463
10,697

27,000
5,759
8,190
9,593
10,850

27,600
5,849
8,306
9,724
10,995

28,200
5,936
8,423
9,854
11,140

28,800
6,023
8,539
9,984
11,285

29,400
6,110
8,655
10,114
11,430

30,000
6,205
8,782
10,256
11,588

30,600
6,305
8,915
10,405
11,754

31,200
6,405
9,048
10,554
11,921

31,800
6,503
9,181
10,703
12,087

32,400
6,596
9,315
10,852
12,253

33,000
6,689
9,448
11,001
12,419

33,600
6,782
9,581
11,151
12,605

34,200
6,875
9,716
11,318
12,791

34,800
6,966
9,861
11,485
12,977

35,400
7,061
9,998
11,652
13,163

36,000
7,158
10,132
11,819
13,349

36,600
7,255
10,266
11,986
13,535

37,200
7,352
10,399
12,151
13,721

37,800
7,449
10,533
12,313
13,908

38,400
7,546
10,666
12,465
14,092

39,000
7,643
10,800
12,617
14,274

39,600
7,740
10,933
12,769
14,456

40,200
7,837
11,067
12,921
14,623

40,800
7,934
11,201
13,070
14,769

41,400
8,031
11,334
13,192
14,906

42,000
8,128
11,453
13,314
15,041

42,600
8,222
11,564
13,435
15,177

43,200
8,304
11,674
13,577
15,313

43,800
8,387
11,785
13,679
15,448

44,400
8,469
11,895
13,800
15,584

45,000
8,551
12,006
13,922
15,720

45,600
8,633
12,116
14,043
15,855

46,200
8,715
12,227
14,165
15,991

46,800
8,797
12,337
14,287
16,126

47,400
8,879
12,448
14,408
16,262

48,000
8,961
12,558
14,530
16,376

48,600
9,043
12,668
14,642
16,487

49,200
9,125
12,779
14,742
16,598

49,800
9,207
12,879
14,841
16,709

50,400
9,290
12,979
14,941
16,820

51,000
9,372
13,079
15,041
16,932

51,600
9,455
13,180
15,140
17,043

52,200
9,538
13,280
15,240
17,154

52,800
9,621
13,380
15,340
17,265

53,400
9,703
13,480
15,432
17,376

54,000
9,786
13,580
15,539
17,487

54,600
9,869
13,680
15,639
17,598

55,200
9,952
13,780
15,738
17,716

55,800
10,034
13,881
15,838
17,849

56,400
10,117
13,981
15,954
17,983

57,000
10,200
14,085
16,074
18,117

57,600
10,283
14,195
16,194
18,250

58,200
10,369
14,306
16,314
18,384

58,800
10,455
14,417
16,434
18,518

59,400
10,542
14,528
16,554
18,651

60,000
10,628
14,638
16,674
18,785

60,600
10,715
14,749
16,793
18,919

61,200
10,801
14,860
16,913
19,052

61,800
10,888
14,971
17,033
19,186

62,400
10,974
15,081
17,153
19,320

63,000
11,061
15,192
17,273
19,451

63,600
11,147
15,303
17,392
19,582

64,200
11,234
15,414
17,509
19,712

64,800
11,320
15,522
17,626
19,843

65,400
11,406
15,628
17,743
19,973

66,000
11,490
15,735
17,860
20,103

66,600
11,575
15,842
17,977
20,234

67,200
11,659
15,949
18,094
20,364

67,800
11,743
16,056
18,211
20,495

68,400
11,827
16,163
18,328
20,625

69,000
11,911
16,270
18,445
20,755

69,600
11,995
16,377
18,562
20,886

70,200
12,080
16,483
18,679
21,016

70,800
12,164
16,590
18,796
21,147

71,400
12,248
16,697
18,913
21,277

72,000
12,332
16,804
19,030
21,408

72,600
12,416
16,911
19,147
21,538

73,200
12,500
17,018
19,264
21,668

73,800
12,585
17,125
19,381
21,799

74,400
12,662
17,232
19,498
21,936

75,000
12,733
17,338
19,617
22,076

75,600
12,805
17,445
19,743
22,216

76,200
12,877
17,560
19,868
22,356

76,800
12,949
17,676
19,994
22,496

77,400
13,024
17,785
20,119
22,636

78,000
13,101
17,885
20,245
22,776

78,600
13,178
17,984
20,370
22,916

79,200
13,254
18,083
20,496
23,056

79,800
13,331
18,182
20,622
23,196

80,400
13,408
18,282
20,743
23,336

81,000
13,485
18,381
20,850
23,476

81,600
13,562
18,480
20,957
23,616

82,200
13,639
18,579
21,064
23,756

82,800
13,715
18,678
21,171
23,896

83,400
13,792
18,778
21,278
24,035

84,000
13,869
18,877
21,385
24,154

84,600
13,946
18,976
21,492
24,273

85,200
14,023
19,075
21,599
24,393

85,800
14,100
19,174
21,707
24,512

86,400
14,177
19,274
21,814
24,632

87,000
14,253
19,373
21,921
34,751

87,600
14,338
19,483
22,039
24,883

88,200
14,424
19,593
22,158
25,015

88,800
14,509
19,702
22,276
25,148

89,400
14,594
19,812
22,395
25,280

90,000
14,679
19,922
22,514
25,410

90,600
14,764
20,032
22,632
25,537

91,200
14,849
20,142
22,751
25,665

91,800
14,934
20,251
22,865
25,792

92,400
15,019
20,361
22,979
25,919

93,000
15,104
20,467
23,093
26,046

93,600
15,189
20,571
23,207
26,173

94,200
15,272
20,674
23,320
26,300

94,800
15,349
20,778
23,434
26,427

95,400
15,427
20,881
23,548
26,554

96,000
15,504
20,985
23,662
26,681

96,600
15,582
21,089
23,776
26,808

97,200
15,659
21,192
23,890
26,935

97,800
15,736
21,296
24,004
27,062

98,400
15,814
21,399
24,118
27,189

99,000
15,891
21,503
24,232
27,316

99,600
15,969
21,606
24,346
27,443

100,200
16,046
21,710
24,460
27,570

100,800
16,123
21,814
24,574
27,697

101,400
16,201
21,917
24,688
27,824

102,000
16,278
22,021
24,802
27,951

102,600
16,356
22,124
24,916
28,078

103,200
16,433
22,228
25,030
28,205

103,800
16,510
22,331
25,143
28,332

104,400
16,588
22,435
25,257
28,459

105,000
16,665
22,539
25,371
28,586

105,600
16,743
22,642
25,485
28,713

106,200
16,820
22,746
25,599
28,840

106,800
16,897
22,849
25,713
28,966

107,400
16,975
22,953
25,827
29,093

108,000
17,052
23,056
25,940
29,219

108,600
17,130
23,160
26,053
29,345

109,200
17,207
23,266
26,167
29,471

109,800
17,284
23,372
26,280
29,598

110,400
17,364
23,478
26,393
29,724

111,000
17,447
23,584
26,506
29,850

111,600
17,529
23,690
26,620
29,976

112,200
17,611
23,796
26,733
30,103

112,800
17,694
23,902
26,846
30,229

113,400
17,776
24,008
26,959
30,355

114,000
17,858
24,114
27,073
30,481

114,600
17,940
24,220
27,186
30,608

115,200
18,023
24,326
27,299
30,734

115,800
18,105
24,432
27,412
30,860

116,400
18,187
24,538
27,525
30,986

117,000
18,270
24,644
27,639
31,113

117,600
18,352
24,750
27,752
31,239

118,200
18,434
24,856
27,865
31,365

118,800
18,517
24,962
27,978
31,491

119,400
18,599
25,068
28,092
31,618

120,000
18,681
25,174
28,205
31,744

120,600
18,763
25,280
28,318
31,870

121,200
18,846
25,386
28,431
31,997

121,800
18,928
25,492
28,545
32,123

122,400
19,010
25,598
28,658
32,249

123,000
19,093
25,704
28,771
32,375

123,600
19,175
25,810
28,884
32,502

124,200
19,257
25,916
28,998
32,628

124,800
19,339
26,022
29,111
32,754

125,400
19,422
26,128
29,224
32,880

126,000
19,504
26,234
29,337
33,007

126,600
19,586
26,340
29,450
33,133

127,200
19,669
26,447
29,564
33,259

127,800
19,748
26,553
29,677
33,385

128,400
19,827
26,659
29,790
33,512

129,000
19,905
26,765
29,903
33,638

129,600
19,983
26,871
30,017
33,764

130,200
20,062
26,977
30,130
33,892

130,800
20,140
27,080
30,243
34,022

131,400
20,219
27,181
30,357
34,152

132,000
20,297
27,282
20,473
34,281

132,600
20,376
27,383
30,590
34,411

133,200
20,454
27,484
30,706
34,541

133,800
20,533
27,585
30,820
34,671

134,400
20,611
27,686
30,931
34,801

135,000
20,688
27,787
31,042
34,931

135,600
20,765
27,888
31,153
35,060

136,200
20,842
27,989
31,264
35,190

136,800
20,918
28,090
31,375
35,319

137,400
20,995
28,191
31,486
35,442

138,000
21,072
28,292
31,597
35,566

138,600
21,149
28,392
31,708
35,690

139,200
21,225
28,493
31,819
35,814

139,800
21,302
28,594
31,930
35,937

140,400
21,379
28,695
32,041
36,061

141,000
21,456
28,796
32,152
36,185

141,600
21,532
28,897
32,263
36,309

142,200
21,609
28,998
32,374
36,432

142,800
21,686
29,099
32,485
36,556

143,400
21,763
29,200
32,596
36,680

144,000
21,839
29,301
32,707
36,804

144,600
21,916
29,402
32,818
36,928

145,200
21,993
29,503
32,929
37,051

145,800
22,070
29,604
33,040
37,175

146,400
22,147
29,705
33,151
37,299

147,000
22,223
29,805
33,262
37,423

147,600
22,300
29,906
33,373
37,546

148,200
22,377
30,007
33,484
37,670

148,800
22,454
30,108
33,595
37,794

149,400
22,530
30,209
33,706
37,918

150,000
22,607
30,310
33,817
38,041

150,600
22,684
30,411
33,928
38,165

151,200
22,761
30,512
34,039
38,289

151,800
22,837
30,613
34,150
38,413

152,400
22,914
30,714
34,261
38,536

153,000
22,991
30,815
34,372
38,660

153,600
23,068
30,916
34,483
38,784

154,200
23,144
31,017
34,594
38,908

154,800
23,221
31,118
34,705
39,031

155,400
23,298
31,219
34,816
39,155

156,000
23,375
31,319
34,927
39,279

156,600
23,452
31,420
35,038
39,403

157,200
23,528
31,521
35,149
39,527

157,800
23,605
31,622
35,260
39,650

158,400
23,682
31,723
35,371
39,774

159,000
23,759
31,824
35,482
39,898

159,600
23,835
31,925
35,593
40,022

160,200
23,912
32,026
35,704
40,145

160,800
23,989
32,127
35,815
40,269

161,400
24,066
32,228
35,926
40,393

162,000
24,142
32,329
36,037
40,517

162,600
24,219
32,430
36,148
40,640

163,200
24,296
32,531
36,259
40,764

163,800
24,373
32,632
36,370
40,888

164,400
24,449
32,732
36,481
41,012

165,000
24,526
32,833
36,592
41,135

165,600
24,603
32,934
36,703
41,259

166,200
24,680
33,035
36,814
41,383

166,800
24,757
33,136
36,925
41,507

167,400
24,833
33,237
37,036
41,630

168,000
24,910
33,338
37,147
41,735

168,600
24,987
33,439
37,258
41,836

169,200
25,064
33,540
37,366
41,937

169,800
25,140
33,641
37,457
42,039

170,400
25,217
33,742
37,548
42,140

171,000
25,294
33,837
37,639
42,242

171,600
25,371
33,924
37,730
42,343

172,200
25,447
34,012
37,821
42,445

172,800
25,520
34,100
37,912
42,546

173,400
25,591
34,187
38,003
42,648

174,000
25,662
34,275
38,094
42,749

174,600
25,733
34,363
38,184
42,850

175,200
25,804
34,451
38,275
42,952

175,800
25,876
34,538
38,366
43,053

176,400
25,947
34,626
38,457
43,155

177,000
26,018
34,714
38,548
43,256

177,600
26,089
34,802
38,639
43,358

178,200
26,160
34,889
38,730
43,459

178,800
26,231
34,977
38,821
43,561

179,400
26,302
35,065
38,912
43,662

180,000
26,374
35,152
39,003
43,764

180,600
26,445
35,240
39,094
43,865

181,200
26,516
35,328
39,185
43,966

181,800
26,587
35,416
39,276
44,068

182,400
26,658
35,503
39,367
44,169

183,000
26,729
35,591
39,458
44,271

183,600
26,801
35,679
39,549
44,372

184,200
26,872
35,767
39,640
44,474

184,800
26,943
35,854
39,731
44,575

185,400
27,014
35,942
39,822
44,677

186,000
27,085
36,030
39,913
44,778

186,600
27,156
36,117
40,004
44,879

187,200
27,227
36,205
40,095
44,981

187,800
27,299
36,293
40,186
45,082

188,400
27,370
36,381
40,277
45,184

189,000
27,441
36,468
40,368
45,285

189,600
27,512
36,556
40,459
45,387

190,200
27,583
36,644
40,550
45,488

190,800
27,654
36,732
40,641
45,590

191,400
27,725
36,819
40,732
45,691

192,000
27,797
36,907
40,823
45,793

192,600
27,868
36,995
40,914
45,894

193,200
27,939
37,082
41,005
45,995

193,800
28,010
37,170
41,096
46,097

194,400
28,081
37,258
41,187
46,198

195,000
28,151
37,346
41,278
46,300

195,600
28,216
37,433
41,369
46,401

196,200
28,282
37,521
41,460
46,503

196,800
28,347
37,609
41,551
46,604

197,400
28,412
37,697
41,642
46,706

198,000
28,478
37,784
41,733
46,807

198,600
28,543
37,864
41,824
46,908

199,200
28,608
37,945
41,915
47,010

199,800
28,674
38,025
42,006
47,111

200,400
28,739
38,106
42,097
47,213

201,000
28,804
38,187
42,188
47,314

201,600
28,870
38,267
42,272
47,416

202,200
28,935
38,348
42,356
47,517

202,800
29,000
38,428
42,439
47,619

203,400
29,066
38,509
42,523
47,720

204,000
29,131
38,589
42,606
47,821

204,600
29,196
38,670
42,690
47,917

205,200
29,262
38,750
42,773
48,010

205,800
29,327
38,831
42,857
48,103

206,400
29,392
38,912
42,941
48,196

207,000
29,458
38,992
43,024
48,289

207,600
29,523
39,073
43,108
48,383

208,200
29,588
39,153
43,191
48,476

208,800
29,654
39,234
43,275
48,569

209,400
29,719
39,314
43,358
48,662

210,000
29,784
39,395
43,442
48,755

210,600
29,850
39,476
43,525
48,848

211,200
29,915
39,556
43,609
48,942

211,800
29,980
39,637
43,693
49,035

212,400
30,046
39,717
43,776
49,128

213,000
30,111
39,798
43,860
49,221

213,600
30,176
39,878
43,943
49,314

214,200
30,242
39,959
44,027
49,407

214,800
30,307
40,039
44,110
49,501

215,400
30,372
40,120
44,194
49,594

216,000
30,438
40,201
44,277
49,687

216,600
30,503
40,281
44,361
49,780

217,200
30,568
40,362
44,445
49,873

217,800
30,634
40,442
44,528
49,966

218,400
30,699
40,523
44,612
50,060

219,000
30,764
40,603
44,695
50,153

219,600
30,830
40,684
44,779
50,246

220,200
30,895
40,765
44,862
50,339

220,800
30,960
40,845
44,946
50,432

221,400
31,026
40,926
45,029
50,525

222,000
31,091
41,006
45,113
50,619

222,600
31,156
41,087
45,197
50,712

223,200
31,222
41,167
45,280
50,805

223,800
31,287
41,248
45,364
50,898

224,400
31,352
41,329
45,447
50,991

225,000
31,418
41,409
45,531
51,084

225,600
31,483
41,490
45,614
51,178

226,200
31,548
41,570
45,698
51,271

226,800
31,614
41,651
45,782
51,364

227,400
31,679
41,731
45,865
51,457

228,000
31,744
41,812
45,949
51,550

228,600
31,810
41,892
46,032
51,643

229,200
31,875
41,973
46,116
51,737

229,800
31,941
42,054
46,199
51,830

230,400
32,006
42,134
46,283
51,923

231,000
32,071
42,215
46,366
52,016

231,600
32,137
42,295
46,450
52,109

232,200
32,202
42,376
46,534
52,202

232,800
32,267
42,456
46,617
52,296

233,400
32,333
42,537
46,701
52,389

234,000
32,398
42,618
46,784
52,482

234,600
32,463
42,698
46,868
52,575

235,200
32,529
42,779
46,951
52,668

235,800
32,594
42,859
47,035
52,761

236,400
32,659
42,940
47,118
52,885

237,000
32,725
43,020
47,202
52,948

237,600
32,790
43,101
47,286
53,041

238,200
32,855
43,181
47,369
53,137

238,800
32,921
43,262
47,453
53,235

239,400
32,986
43,343
47,536
53,332

240,000
33,051
43,423
47,621
53,429

[The above appendices supplement § 16-916.01, Child Support Guideline.]